en: Buffets & Sideboards
xx: Buffets & Sideboards
cs: Bufetové stoly a příborníky
da: Buffetborde og sideborde
de: Buffets & Sideboards
es: Aparadores del comedor
fr: Buffets et bahuts, Buffet, Argentier, Confiturier
it: Buffet e credenze
ja: ビュッフェテーブル・サイドボード
nl: Glazenkasten en buffetten
no: Skjenker og anretningsbord
pl: Bufety i kredensy
pt: Buffets
ru: Буфеты и серванты
sv: Skänker och serveringsbord
tr: Büfeler ve Raflı Dolaplar

en: China Cabinets & Hutches
xx: China Cabinets & Hutches
cs: Porcelánové vitríny
da: Kinesiske skabe og kasser
de: Geschirrschränke
es: Vitrinas
fr: Vaisseliers
it: Vetrinette
ja: カップボード
nl: Porseleinkasten
no: Vitrineskap og skjenker med overskap
pl: Kredensy na porcelanę
pt: Cristaleiras
ru: Серванты и стойки для фарфора
sv: Porslinsskåp och hyllskänkar
tr: Vitrinler ve Kapkacak Dolapları

en: Dressers
xx: Dressers
cs: Šatníky
da: Toiletborde
de: Kommoden
es: Aparadores del dormitorio
fr: Commodes, Commode, Chiffonnier, Semainier (meuble)
it: Cassettiere
ja: タンス・チェスト
nl: Dressoirs
no: Kommoder
pl: Komody
pt: Cômodas
ru: Костюмеры
sv: Byråer
tr: Şifonyerler

en: File Cabinets
xx: File Cabinets
cs: Kartotéky
da: Arkivskabe
de: Aktenschränke
es: Armarios archivadores
fr: Classeur à tiroirs
it: Archivi
ja: ファイルキャビネット
nl: Archiefkasten
no: Arkivskap
pl: Szafy na dokumenty
pt: Arquivos de aço
ru: Шкафы для документов
sv: Arkivskåp
tr: Dosya Dolapları

en: Ironing Centers
xx: Ironing Centers
cs: Žehlicí centra
da: Strygestationer
de: Bügelcenter
es: Centros de planchado
fr: Armoires à repasser
it: Postazioni per stiratura
ja: アイロン台付きキャビネット
nl: Strijkstations
no: Strykeskap
pl: Szafki do prasowania
pt: Móveis com tábua de passar roupa
ru: Гладильные центры
sv: Strykbrädeskåp
tr: Ütü Dolapları

en: Kitchen Cabinets
xx: Kitchen Cabinets
cs: Kuchyňské skříňky a příborníky
da: Køkkenskabe
de: Küchenschränke
es: Armarios de cocina
fr: Placards de cuisine
it: Pensili da cucina
ja: キッチンキャビネット
nl: Keukenkasten
no: Kjøkkenskap
pl: Szafki kuchenne
pt: Armários de cozinha
ru: Кухонные шкафчики
sv: Köksskåp
tr: Mutfak Dolapları

en: Magazine Racks
xx: Magazine Racks
cs: Přihrádky na časopisy
da: Magasinholdere
de: Zeitschriftenständer
es: Revisteros
fr: Porte-revues, Porte-revue sur pied
it: Portariviste
ja: マガジンラック
nl: Magazijnrekken
no: Bladhyller
pl: Gazetowniki
pt: Porta-revistas
ru: Стеллажи для журналов
sv: Tidskriftshyllor
tr: Mecmualıklar

en: Media Storage Cabinets & Racks
xx: Media Storage Cabinets & Racks
cs: Skříňky a přihrádky na mediální nosiče
da: Medieopbevaring
de: Mediaaufbewahrung
es: Almacenamiento para CD y DVD
fr: Fixations et meubles de rangement multimédia, Meuble range CD, Meuble de téléphone
it: Scaffali e armadietti per supporti multimediali
ja: メディア収納家具
nl: Mediakasten en -rekken
no: Skap og stativer til medieoppbevaring
pl: Stojaki na płyty
pt: Gabinetes e racks para armazenamento de mídia
ru: Шкафы и стойки для носителей информации
sv: Medieförvaring
tr: Medya Saklama Dolapları ve Rafları

en: Storage Cabinets & Lockers
xx: Storage Cabinets & Lockers
cs: Úložné a šatní skříňky
da: Opbevaringsskabe og -kabinetter
de: Büroschränke
es: Taquillas y armarios de almacenamiento
fr: Casiers et armoires de rangement
it: Armadietti e stipi
ja: ロッカー・キャビネット
nl: Opbergkasten en -kluisjes
no: Garderobe- og oppbevaringsskap
pl: Szafki biurowe
pt: Armários e gabinetes de armazenamento
ru: Шкафчики
sv: Förvaringsskåp och garderober
tr: Saklama Kabinleri ve Dolapları

en: Storage Chests
xx: Storage Chests
cs: Úložné truhly
da: Dragkister
de: Aufbewahrungstruhen
es: Baúles de almacenamiento
fr: Coffres de rangement, Coffre, Malle
it: Bauli e cassapanche
ja: 収納ボックス
nl: Opslagkisten
no: Oppbevaringskister
pl: Skrzynie i kufry
pt: Caixas de armazenamento
ru: Сундуки
sv: Lagringskistor
tr: Eşya Saklama Sandıkları

en: Hope Chests
xx: Hope Chests
cs: Truhly na výbavu
da: Brudekister
de: Aussteuertruhen
es: Baúles para el ajuar
fr: Trousseaux
it: Cassapanche
ja: ベンチ型収納ボックス
nl: Uitzetkast
no: Utstyrskister
pl: Skrzynie
pt: Baús de enxoval
ru: Сундуки для приданого
sv: Brudkistor
tr: Çeyiz Sandıkları

en: Toy Chests
xx: Toy Chests
cs: Truhly na hračky
da: Legetøjskister
de: Spielzeugtruhen
es: Baúles para juguetes
fr: Coffres à jouets
it: Scatole portagiochi
ja: おもちゃ箱
nl: Speelgoedkisten
no: Lekekasser
pl: Skrzynie na zabawki
pt: Caixas de brinquedo
ru: Сундуки для игрушек
sv: Leksakslådor
tr: Oyuncak Sandıkları

en: Vanities
xx: Vanities
cs: Toaletní stolky
da: Små pynteborde
de: Wasch- und Schminktische
es: Tocadores
fr: Meubles lavabos, Meuble d'évier
it: Componenti di arredo
ja: 化粧台・鏡台
nl: Kaptafels
no: Sminkebord
pl: Toaletki
pt: Armários
ru: Туалетные столики
sv: Toalettbord och underskåp
tr: Çekmeceli Dolaplar

en: Bathroom Vanities
xx: Bathroom Vanities
cs: Koupelnové stolky
da: Badeværelsesborde
de: Badezimmerwaschtische
es: Tocadores de baño
fr: Meubles sous vasque, Meuble sous vasque
it: Componenti di arredo bagno
ja: 洗面化粧台
nl: Badkamerkaptafels
no: Sminkebord for bad
pl: Toaletki do łazienki
pt: Armários para banheiro
ru: Туалетные столики для ванных комнат
sv: Badrumsunderskåp
tr: Banyo Dolapları

en: Bedroom Vanities
xx: Bedroom Vanities
cs: Toaletní stolky do ložnice
da: Sengeborde
de: Schminktische
es: Tocadores para dormitorios
fr: Coiffeuses, Coiffeuse
it: Coiffeuse
ja: 鏡台・ドレッサー
nl: Slaapkamerkaptafels
no: Sminkebord for soverom
pl: Toaletki do sypialni
pt: Penteadeiras
ru: Туалетные столики для спальных комнат
sv: Toalettbord
tr: Yatak Odası Dolapları

en: Wine & Liquor Cabinets
xx: Wine & Liquor Cabinets
cs: Skříňky na víno a alkohol
da: Vin- og spiritusskabe
de: Spirituosenschränke
es: Armarios para vino y licores
fr: Caves à vins et spiritueux
it: Armadietti per vini e liquori
ja: ボトルキャビネット
nl: Wijn- en drankenkasten
no: Vin- og spritskap
pl: Szafy na wino i likiery
pt: Armários de vinhos e licores
ru: Шкафы для вина и спиртных напитков
sv: Vin- och spritskåp
tr: Şarap ve Likör Dolapları

en: Wine Racks
xx: Wine Racks
cs: Regály na víno
da: Vinreoler
de: Weinregale
es: Botelleros
fr: Étagères à bouteilles, Casier à bouteille, Casier à vin, Range-bouteilles, Range bouteille, Meuble range-bouteilles
it: Rastrelliere vini
ja: ワインラック
nl: Wijnrekken
no: Vinreoler
pl: Regały na wino
pt: Suportes para vinho
ru: Винные шкафы
sv: Vinställ
tr: Şarap Rafları

en: Carts & Islands
xx: Carts & Islands
cs: Policové vozíky
da: Vogne
de: Kücheninseln & Küchenwagen
es: Carros e islas
fr: Chariots et îlots
it: Carrelli e isole
ja: ワゴン
nl: Trolleys
no: Trillevogner
pl: Wózki
pt: Carrinhos
ru: Тележки
sv: Rullbord
tr: Tekerlekli Sehpalar

en: Kitchen & Dining Carts
xx: Kitchen & Dining Carts
cs: Kuchyňské vozíky
da: Køkken- og middagsvogne
de: Küchenwagen
es: Carros de cocina y comedor
fr: Dessertes, Desserte
it: Carrelli da cucina
ja: キッチンワゴン
nl: Keukentrolleys
no: Kjøkken- og spisevogner
pl: Wózki kuchenne
pt: Carrinhos de cozinha
ru: Кухонные тележки
sv: Rullbord för kök
tr: Tekerlekli Mutfak ve Yemek Odası Sehpaları

en: Kitchen Islands
xx: Kitchen Islands
cs: Kuchyňské ostrůvky
da: Køkkenøer
de: Kücheninseln
es: Islas de cocina
fr: Îlots de cuisine, Îlot central, Ilot central
it: Isole per cucina
ja: キッチンアイランド
nl: Kookeilanden
no: Kjøkkenøyer
pl: Wyspy kuchenne
pt: Ilhas de cozinha
ru: Кухонные острова
sv: Köksöar
tr: Mutfak Orta Tezgahları